Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.050

Examining board—Powers and duties. (Effective until October 1, 2025.)

(1) The board shall adopt such rules as it deems necessary to carry out its functions.

(2) The board shall examine the qualifications of applicants for licensing under this chapter, to determine which applicants are eligible for licensing under this chapter and shall forward to the secretary the names of applicants so eligible.

(3) The board shall administer examinations to qualified applicants on at least an annual basis. The board shall determine the subject matter and scope of the examination, except as provided in RCW 18.83.170. The board may allow applicants to take the examination upon the granting of their doctoral degree before completion of their internship for supervised experience.

(4) The board shall keep a complete record of its own proceedings, of the questions given in examinations, of the names and qualifications of all applicants, and the names and addresses of all licensed psychologists. The examination paper of such applicant shall be kept on file for a period of at least one year after examination.

(5) The board shall, by rule, adopt a code of ethics for psychologists which is designed to protect the public interest.

(6) The board may require that persons licensed under this chapter as psychologists obtain and maintain professional liability insurance in amounts determined by the board to be practicable and reasonably available.

[ 2004 c 262 s 8; 1994 c 35 s 2; 1991 c 3 s 196; 1986 c 27 s 3; 1984 c 279 s 78; 1965 c 70 s 5; 1955 c 305 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—2004 c 262: See note following RCW 18.06.050.

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.

PDFRCW 18.83.050

Examining board—Powers and duties. (Effective October 1, 2025.)

(1) The board shall adopt such rules as it deems necessary to carry out its functions.

(2) The board shall examine the qualifications of applicants for licensing under this chapter, to determine which applicants are eligible for licensing under this chapter and shall forward to the secretary the names of applicants so eligible.

(3) The board shall administer examinations to qualified applicants on at least an annual basis. The board shall determine the subject matter and scope of the examination, except as provided in RCW 18.83.170. The board may allow applicants to take the examination upon the granting of their doctoral degree before completion of their internship for supervised experience.

(4) The board shall keep a complete record of its own proceedings, of the questions given in examinations, of the names and qualifications of all applicants, and the names and addresses of all licensed psychologists and licensed psychological associates. The examination paper of such applicant shall be kept on file for a period of at least one year after examination.

(5) The board shall, by rule, adopt a code of ethics for psychologists and licensed psychological associates which is designed to protect the public interest.

(6) The board may require that persons licensed under this chapter as psychologists or licensed psychological associates obtain and maintain professional liability insurance in amounts determined by the board to be practicable and reasonably available.

[ 2024 c 371 s 3; 2004 c 262 s 8; 1994 c 35 s 2; 1991 c 3 s 196; 1986 c 27 s 3; 1984 c 279 s 78; 1965 c 70 s 5; 1955 c 305 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2024 c 371 ss 1-12, 14, and 16: See note following RCW 18.19.020.

Rule making—2024 c 371 ss 1-16: See note following RCW 18.83.020.

Findings—2004 c 262: See note following RCW 18.06.050.

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.